Missouri, session 2026, SB1209.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 135, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 135.2000, to read as
follows:
135.2000. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms shall mean:
(1) "Department", the Missouri department of revenue;
(2) "Labor costs", the total compensation paid by a
taxpayer to an employee as reported in box 5 of the
employee's W-2. For the purposes of this subdivision,
"employee" shall mean an individual employed by a taxpayer
as pressroom or mailroom staff;
(3) "Qualifying newspaper printing plant", any
individual, partnership, or corporation as described under
section 143.441 or 143.471 that:
(a) Is headquartered in this state; and
(b) Derives a majority of printing revenue from the
printing of newspapers intended for public distribution;
(4) "State tax liability", any liability incurred by a
taxpayer pursuant to the provisions of chapter 143 or
chapter 148, exclusive of the provisions relating to the

SB 1209 2
withholding of tax as provided for in sections 143.191 to
143.265 and related provisions;
(5) "Tax credit", a credit against the tax otherwise
due under chapter 143, excluding withholding tax imposed
under sections 143.191 to 143.265;
(6) "Taxpayer", any qualifying newspaper printing
plant that is subject to the tax imposed under chapter 143,
excluding withholding tax imposed under sections 143.191 to
143.265.
2. For all tax years beginning on or after January 1,
2026, a taxpayer shall be authorized to claim a tax credit
against the taxpayer's state tax liability in an amount
equal to fifty percent of the labor costs incurred by the
taxpayer during the tax year.
3. (1) Any amount of tax credits authorized pursuant
to this section that exceeds a taxpayer's state tax
liability shall be considered an overpayment of taxes and
shall be refunded to the taxpayer.
(2) Tax credits authorized pursuant to this section
may be transferred, sold, or assigned.
(3) The total amount of tax credits that may be
authorized pursuant to this section in any tax year shall
not exceed seven million dollars.
4. A taxpayer seeking tax credits authorized pursuant
to this section shall submit an application to the
department on a form to be provided by the department. Such
application form shall include, but not be limited to:
(1) The taxpayer's name and address;
(2) The total amount of labor costs incurred during
the tax year; and
(3) Any other information reasonably requested by the
department.

SB 1209 3
5. The department may promulgate rules to implement
the provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a
rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay
the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
6. Pursuant to section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset
act:
(1) The program authorized pursuant to this section
shall automatically sunset six years after the effective
date of this section unless reauthorized by an act of the
general assembly;
(2) This section shall terminate on September first of
the calendar year immediately following the calendar year in
which the program authorized pursuant to this section is
sunset; and
(3) The provisions of this subsection shall not be
construed to impair or impede the state's fulfillment of any
obligations, including the authorization, issuance, or
redemption of tax credits, incurred pursuant to this section
prior to the date the program authorized pursuant to this
section is sunset.
✓